Wyoming statutes. Title 6 Crimes and Offenses
Chapter 4 Offenses Against Morals, Decency and Family

Cross references. —

As to sexual assault generally, see article 3 of chapter 2 of this title.

As to encouraging persons under 16 years of age to engage in illicit sexual intercourse, see §

6-2-314

et seq.

As to taking immodest, immoral or indecent liberties with children or encouraging child with reference thereto, see §

6-2-319

.

As to child protective services, see §§

14-3-201

through

14-3-215

.

As to general powers of cities and towns to regulate, prevent or suppress obscene or profane language, see §

15-1-103

.